Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.060

Consolidated cities—Procedure.

The city council of any city which is composed of two or more cities or towns which have been or may hereafter be consolidated may make and pass all resolutions, orders and ordinances necessary for any assessment where the improvement was made or was being made by a component city or town prior to consolidation.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.43.060. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 64; RRS s 9417.]